zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 头发护理 > 脱发遮瑕膏: 增发纤维; 发根遮瑕粉/遮瑕棒; 发根遮瑕喷雾
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Plaukų priežiūra > Plaukų slinkimą maskuojančios priemonės: Plaukų tankinimo pluoštai; Šaknų maskuojantys milteliai ir pieštukų formos priemonės; Šaknis maskuojantys purškalai
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Hiustenhoito > Hiustenlähdön peiteaineet: Hiusten kuitutäyteaine; Tyven peitevärijauhe ja -puikko; Tyven peitevärisuihke
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Hair Care > Hair Loss Concealers: Hair Building Fibers; Root Concealer Powders & Sticks; Root Concealer Sprays
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 모발 관리 > 흑채: 모발 증량 섬유; 뿌리 커버 파우더 및 스틱; 뿌리 커버 스프레이
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Haarkosmetik > Haarverdichter: Haaraufbaufasern; Ansatzkaschier-Puder & -stifte; Ansatzkaschier-Sprays
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Haarverzorging > Maskeermiddelen bij haaruitval: Haar opbouw vezels; Uitgroei concealer poeders en stiften; Uitgroei concealer sprays
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Περιποίηση μαλλιών > Καλυπτικά ατελειών (κονσίλερ) για κάλυψη της τριχόπτωσης: Ίνες πύκνωσης μαλλιών; Πούδρες και στικ κάλυψης ρίζας; Σπρέι κάλυψης ρίζας
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Hårvård > Medel för att dölja håravfall: Hårförstärkande fibrer; Cncealerpuder och stift för hårbotten; Cncealersprayer för hårbotten
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Nega las > Sredstva za prekrivanje izpadanja las: Vlaknine za zgostitev las; Pudri in svinčniki za prekrivanje narastka; Razpršila za prekrivanje narastka
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hårpleje > Concealere mod hårtab: Hårfortykkelsesfibre; Hårrods-concealer-pudder og stifter; Hårrods-concealer-sprays
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado capilar > Productos para ocultar la pérdida capilar: Fibras capilares densificadoras; Polvos y barras correctoras de raíces; Aerosoles correctores de raíces
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cura dei capelli > Correttori per la perdita di capelli: Fibre per la costruzione dei capelli; Polveri e stick correttore di radice; Spray correttore di radice
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 頭髮保養 > 黑彩染髮噴霧: 增髮纖維; 髮根遮蓋粉及棒; 髮根遮蓋噴霧
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Saç Bakımı > Saç Dökülmesi Kapatıcılar: Saç Yoğunlaştırıcı Lifler; Kök Kapatıcı Tozlar ve Çubuklar; Kök Kapatıcı Spreyler
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Pielęgnacja włosów > Produkty maskujące przerzedzenia włosów: Włókna zagęszczające włosy; Pudry i sztyfty do maskowania odrostów; Spraye do maskowania odrostów
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Hårpleie > Produkter for skjuling av hårtap: Hårbyggefibre; Rotskjulingspulver og stifter; Rotskjulingsspray
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soin des cheveux > Correcteurs de perte de cheveux: Fibres capillaires densifiantes; Poudres et sticks couvre-racines; Sprays couvre-racines
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Hajápolás > Hajhullás elleni korrektorok: Hajdúsító szálak; Hajtőfedő porok és rudak; Hajtőfedő spray-k
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijirea părului > Corectoare pentru căderea părului: Fibre de construcție pentru păr; Pudre și stickuri pentru acoperirea rădăcinilor; Sprayuri pentru acoperirea rădăcinilor
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за волосами > Средства для маскировки выпадения волос: Строительные волокна для волос; Пудры и карандаши для маскировки корней; Спреи для маскировки корней
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > ヘアケア用品 > 薄毛用コンシーラー: 増毛ファイバー; 白髪隠しパウダー・スティック; 白髪隠しスプレー
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega kose > Sredstva za prikrivanje ispadanja kose: Vlakna za prorijeđenu kosu; Puderi i stikovi za prekrivanje korijena; Sprejevi za prekrivanje korijena
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc tóc > Sản phẩm che khuyết điểm tóc thưa/ hói: Sợi tóc giả tạo dày; Phấn và thỏi che chân tóc; Xịt che chân tóc
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados com os cabelos > Corretivos para perda de cabelo: Fibras capilares densificadoras; Pós e bastões corretivos de raiz; Sprays corretivos de raiz
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Грижа за косата > Коректори за косопад: Уплътняващи влакна за коса; Пудри и стикове за прикриване на бели корени; Спрейове за прикриване на бели корени
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o vlasy > Prípravky proti vypadávaniu vlasov: Vlasové zahusťovacie vlákna; Púdre a tyčinky na zakrytie odrastov; Spreje na zakrytie odrastov
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o vlasy > Přípravky na zhušťování vlasů: Vlasová vlákna pro zahušťování; Pudrové a tyčinkové korekcí odrostů; Sprejové korekce odrostů
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado do cabelo > Corretores de perda do cabelo: Fibras capilares de preenchimento; Pós e bastões corretores de raízes; Sprays corretores de raízes
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลผม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ปกปิดหนังศีรษะ: ไฟเบอร์เติมผม; ผงและแท่งปกปิดโคนผม; สเปรย์ปกปิดโคนผม